Wisconsin, session 2025, SB16.
do enact as follows:SB16,1Section 1. 19.32 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:19.32 (1) “Authority” means any of the following having custody of a record: a state or local office, elective official, agency, board, commission, committee, council, department or public body corporate and politic created by the constitution or by any law, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-governmental corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment corporation; a special purpose district; any court of law; the assembly or senate; a nonprofit corporation which receives more than 50 percent of its funds from a county or a municipality, as defined in s. 59.001 (3), and which provides services related to public health or safety to the county or municipality; a university police department under s. 175.42; an interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by this subchapter; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the foregoing.SB16,2Section 2. 19.32 (1db) of the statutes is created to read:19.32 (1db) “Interscholastic athletic association” means a nonprofit association, as defined in s. 184.01 (2), or a nonstock, nonprofit corporation organized under ch. 181, that coordinates athletic events or contests for students enrolled in grades 9 to 12 in public schools.SB16,3Section 3. 19.36 (17) and (18) of the statutes are created to read:19.36 (17) Interscholastic athletic association referee records. An interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by this subchapter may withhold access to records concerning individual referees.(18) Interscholastic athletic association pupil records. Records concerning an individual pupil maintained by an interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by this subchapter are not subject to the right of inspection or copying under s. 19.35 (1).SB16,4Section 4. 19.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:19.82 (1) “Governmental body” means a state or local agency, board, commission, committee, council, department or public body corporate and politic created by constitution, statute, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-governmental corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment corporation; a local exposition district under subch. II of ch. 229; a long-term care district under s. 46.2895; an interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by this subchapter; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the foregoing, but excludes any such body or committee or subunit of such body which is formed for or meeting for the purpose of collective bargaining under subch. I, IV, or V of ch. 111.SB16,5Section 5. 19.82 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:19.82 (1m) “Interscholastic athletic association” means a nonprofit association, as defined in s. 184.01 (2), or a nonstock, nonprofit corporation organized under ch. 181, that coordinates athletic events or contests for students enrolled in grades 9 to 12 in public schools.SB16,6Section 6. 118.1335 of the statutes is created to read:118.1335 Interscholastic athletic association membership. No school district may be a member of an interscholastic athletic association, as defined in s. 19.32 (1db), unless the interscholastic athletic association elects to be governed by subchs. II and V of ch. 19. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb16 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb16 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB16 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB16 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB16: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting